Massachusetts, session 194th, H4438.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 2-3 of chapter 2 of The charter of the town of Swampscott, which is 
on file in the office of the archivist of the commonwealth, as provided by section 12 of chapter 
43B of the General Laws, is hereby amended by striking out the third sentence and inserting in 
place thereof the following sentence:- The annual Town meeting shall meet on the third Monday 
of May each year and on the first Monday in December each year, and at such other times and 
places as shall be set forth by the select board in the warrant for each meeting. 
SECTION 2. This charter amendment supersedes any inconsistent provisions of the 
charter of by-laws of the town of Swampscott.  
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.